Nebraska, session 109, LB304A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the Nebraska Health
Care Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $3,157,170 from the Nebraska Health Care
Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and Human Services, for
Program 347, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 304, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26 $-0-
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $3,157,170 Cash
Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-